Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-501
Reclamation districts; declaration of purpose.

It is hereby declared that to provide for the conservation of the water resources of the State of Nebraska and for the greatest beneficial use of water within the state, the organization of reclamation districts and the construction of works as herein defined by such districts are a public use and will: (1) Be essentially for the public benefit and advantage of the people of the State of Nebraska; (2) indirectly benefit all industries of the state; (3) indirectly benefit the State of Nebraska in the increase of its taxable property valuation; (4) directly benefit municipalities by providing adequate supplies of water for domestic use; (5) directly benefit lands to be irrigated from works to be constructed; (6) directly benefit lands now under irrigation by stabilizing the flow of water in streams and by increasing flow and return flow of water to such streams by replenishing and maintaining subsurface supplies; and (7) promote the comfort, safety and welfare of the people of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 1(1), p. 523.

This and the succeeding section declare the public policy, use, benefits, and purpose of organization of reclamation districts. Nebraska Mid-State Reclamation District v. Hall County, 152 Neb. 410, 41 N.W.2d 397 (1950).